Massachusetts, session 194th, S617.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
(a) There shall be established a task force to be known as the pesticide control
modernization and environmental protection task force. The task force shall study the
commonwealth’s statutes, regulations, and practices governing pesticide control in the
commonwealth and make recommendations on the items detailed in subsection (b) of this act.
The task force shall consist of the following members or their designee: the secretary of
energy and environmental affairs, who shall serve as chair; the commissioner of agricultural
resources; the commissioner of conservation and recreation; the commissioner of environmental
protection; and the commissioner of public health. The task force shall also include 20 additional
members appointed by the chairs of the joint committee on environment, natural resources and
agriculture: 1 of whom shall be an academic expert in environmental and health impacts of
of 4

pesticides; 1 of whom shall be an ecological risk assessor with a background in ecotoxicology; 1
of whom shall be a licensed pesticide applicator with expertise in integrated pest management
practices; 1 of whom shall be a representative of a statewide land conservation organization; 1 of
whom shall be a representative of a regional or statewide river protection organization; 1 of
whom shall be a representative of a statewide wildlife protection organization; 1 of whom shall
be a representative of a statewide organization representing farms and agriculture; 1 of whom
shall be a representative of a statewide organization representing organic farms and agriculture; 1
of whom shall be a representative of a statewide organization representing beekeepers or groups
concerned about pollinators; 1 of whom shall be a representative of a statewide lawn care
organization; 1 of whom shall be a representative of a statewide nursery and landscape
organization; 1 of whom shall be a representative of a statewide consumer protection
organization; 1 of whom shall be a veterinarian or academic with expertise in pesticide impacts
on animals; 1 of whom shall be a representative of a statewide horticultural or grower
association; 1 of whom shall be a representative of pesticide manufacturers or distributors; 1 of
whom shall be a representative of a statewide organization representing cranberry growers; 1 of
whom shall be a representative of a statewide organization of retailers; 1 of whom shall be a
member of a town natural resources commission or equivalent; 1 of whom shall be a
representative of a research institution affiliated with a public university located in the
commonwealth with expertise in integrated pest management practices or organic or regenerative
agriculture; and 1 of whom shall be a member of a city natural resources commission or
equivalent.
(b) The task force shall review and make recommendations to improve the ability of the
commonwealth to prevent and mitigate adverse impacts of pesticide use on the environment and
of 4

public health. The issues examined by the task force shall include, but not be limited to: (i) the
title, structure, membership, and operation of the pesticide board and the pesticide board
subcommittee currently within the department of agricultural resources; (ii) the ability of the
pesticide board and pesticide board subcommittee to effectively interact with other state
agencies, stakeholders, and the public; (iii) the commonwealth’s relationship with federal
pesticide regulators and ability to implement federal pesticide regulations on the state level in a
manner consistent with pesticide use reduction goals; (iv) the effectiveness of chapter 132B of
the general laws and other state and federal statutes in reducing harmful impacts of pesticide use;
(v) the ability of the pesticide board and the pesticide board subcommittee to quickly and
effectively implement science-based regulation of pesticides and pesticide products; (vi) the
effectiveness of the commonwealth’s licensing and continuing education process for pesticide
users in promoting responsible, limited use of pesticides and reducing adverse impacts of
pesticide use; (vii) the implementation of section 5A of said chapter 132B as it pertains to
pesticide use reduction and annual reporting requirements; (viii) the impacts of current pesticide
use practices on watersheds and other vulnerable natural resources and on environmental justice
populations; (ix) opportunities to expand integrated pest management planning and practices to
additional public lands; (x) opportunities to implement organic landcare practices on public
lands; (xi) the accessibility, utility and transparency of the commonwealth’s pesticide use
reporting system; and (xii) public awareness and education regarding pesticide use and its
environmental and health impacts.
(c) The task force shall issue a report detailing its findings and recommendations, which
shall include, but not be limited to, detailed investigation of the issue areas detailed in subsection
(b) and a broad assessment of the operational effectiveness of the pesticide board and pesticide
of 4

board subcommittee. The report shall include a recommendation of the appropriate location
within state government to locate the board and the subcommittee, the appropriate titles for the
board and the subcommittee respectively, in order to clearly communicate the roles of each body,
and may include recommendations of additional oversight and accountability measures necessary
for the board and the subcommittee to effectively meet the statutory goals of safe and responsible
pesticide use established in chapter 132B.
(d) All meetings of the task force shall be open to the public. The task force shall hold at
least 1 public listening session with a remote participation option. The task force shall convene
its first meeting no later than six months after enactment.
(e) The task force shall file its findings, recommendations and accompanying legislation,
if any, with the clerks of the house of representatives and the senate, the joint committee on ways
and means and the joint committee on environment, natural resources and agriculture not later
than one year after enactment.
of 4